Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [3.99] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of sections 3.99 to 3.993, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Agency. new text end new text begin "Agency" means any executive branch board, commission, council, committee, authority, office, or comparable public entity established by law. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Department. new text end new text begin "Department" means each of the departments of state identified in section 15.01. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Inferior officer. new text end new text begin "Inferior officer" means the head, deputy head, and assistant heads of any agency or department and the employee who serves as director or other head of any division, bureau, office, or other organizational unit within an agency or department. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Malfeasance. new text end new text begin "Malfeasance" means the willful commission of an unlawful or wrongful act in the performance of an inferior officer's duties that is outside the scope of the authority of the inferior officer and that infringes on the rights of any person or entity. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Nonfeasance. new text end new text begin "Nonfeasance" means the willful failure to perform a specific act that is a required part of the duties of the inferior officer. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [3.991] LEGISLATIVE REMOVAL OF INFERIOR EXECUTIVE BRANCH OFFICERS. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary or any plan established by the commissioner of management and budget under chapter 43A, the legislature may require the immediate removal of an inferior officer for malfeasance or nonfeasance as provided in sections 3.992 and 3.993. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [3.992] COMPLAINT; PUBLIC PROCEEDINGS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Complaint. new text end new text begin (a) Any legislative member of the senate may request the removal of an inferior officer by submitting a complaint to the senate majority leader and any legislative member of the house of representatives may request the removal of an inferior officer by submitting a complaint to the speaker of the house. The complaint must include the facts that allege with specificity an inferior officer committed malfeasance or nonfeasance in the performance of the inferior officer's duties. new text end new text begin (b) Within ten days of receiving a complaint under paragraph (a), the senate majority leader or speaker of the house must: new text end new text begin (1) forward the complaint to the appropriate legislative committee as determined by the associated rules of the house of representatives or senate; and new text end new text begin (2) cause a copy of the complaint and any supporting materials to be delivered on behalf of the house of representatives or senate to the governor and any inferior officer named in the complaint. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public proceedings; waiver. new text end new text begin (a) Within 30 days of receiving a complaint under subdivision 1, the legislative committee must commence public proceedings according to this section and the rules of the complainant's house of the legislature. The complaint may be amended by right of the complainant at any time prior to 20 days before the public proceedings begin. The chair of the legislative committee may permit later amendment of the complaint only for good cause. new text end new text begin (b) The complainant and the inferior officer may be represented by legal counsel at their own expense. The inferior officer has the right to respond to all charges; to call and cross-examine witnesses; to introduce exhibits; to be furnished with exhibits, documents, and evidence in possession of the legislative committee; and to rebut evidence offered by the complainant. The complainant must be notified of all public hearings on the complaint and must be given notice of the opportunity to offer evidence of matters alleged in the complaint. new text end new text begin (c) During the public proceedings, the legislative committee must take testimony and evidence sufficient to determine: new text end new text begin (1) whether the complainant has shown by clear and convincing evidence that the factual allegations of malfeasance or nonfeasance by the inferior officer are true; and new text end new text begin (2) if so, whether the facts found to be true constitute malfeasance or nonfeasance. new text end new text begin (d) The existence and substance of a complaint, including any supporting materials, and all proceedings and records are public. new text end new text begin (e) An inferior officer who is the subject of a complaint may waive in writing the right to public proceedings under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Disposition of complaint. new text end new text begin (a) The legislative committee must dismiss the complaint at any time if a majority of legislative committee members determine that the standard under subdivision 2, paragraph (c), has not been met. new text end new text begin (b) If a majority of legislative committee members determine that the facts found to be true constitute malfeasance or nonfeasance, the legislative committee must report the complaint and the legislative committee's recommendations to the full house of the legislature for final disposition. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [3.993] FINAL DISPOSITION; REMOVAL. new text end new text begin When in receipt of a complaint and recommendations reported under section 3.992, the house of the legislature may vote on the question of whether to remove the inferior officer. If a majority of the members elected to each house of the legislature votes in favor, the inferior officer must be discharged by the governor or the governor's designee effective the day after the second house of the legislature notifies the governor that both houses of the legislature have voted in favor of removal. The complaint and recommendations submitted to each house of the legislature by their respective legislative committees under section 3.992 need not be identical, so long as each complaint contains allegations of malfeasance or nonfeasance against the same inferior officer. new text end